Vermont, session 2025-2026, S136.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Vermont State Colleges Corporation; Board of Trustees * * *
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 2172 is amended to read:
§ 2172. TRUSTEES; APPOINTMENT; VACANCIES
(a) The Corporation shall be governed by a board of 15 17 trustees who
shall be appointed or elected as follows:
VT LEG #380539 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.136
2025 Page 2 of 8
(1) Biennially, the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate,
shall appoint trustees to serve for four-year terms expiring March 1 of the year
of the biennial session. Five trustees may be in office at one time under this
subdivision. In the event of any vacancy occurring between biennial sessions
in an office under this subdivision, the Governor, pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 257,
shall fill the vacancy, and the term of a person so appointed shall expire on
March 1 in the year of the next following biennial session.
(2)(A) One trustee Two trustees shall be a student trustee trustees:
(i) who is a are matriculated student students at an educational
institution operated by the Vermont State Colleges Corporation;
(ii) who is are pursuing a degree program; and
(iii) who has have reached the age of majority.
(B) The student trustee trustees shall serve a one-year term terms
expiring on June 1. The student trustee trustees shall be appointed, and a
vacancy may be filled, from among those eligible students applying for the
position by the decision of those members of the steering committee of the
Vermont State Colleges Student Association who have been elected at large to
that committee by the students at their respective colleges. No student trustee
may serve more than two consecutive terms.
(3) Four trustees shall be legislative trustees who are members of the
General Assembly at the time of their election. Legislative trustees shall serve
VT LEG #380539 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.136
2025 Page 3 of 8
four-year terms expiring on March 1 of the second year of the biennial session,
and they shall be elected by joint assembly of the Legislature. Vacancies for
any cause shall be filled by the General Assembly at its earliest opportunity,
and the term of a person so appointed shall expire on March 1 of the next even
numbered year.
(4) Four trustees shall be elected by the Board of Trustees to four-year
terms expiring on March 1. Vacancies for any cause shall be filled by the
remaining members of the Board of Trustees, and the term of the person so
appointed shall expire on the next following March 1.
(5) One trustee shall be faculty or staff employed by the Vermont State
Colleges Corporation and elected by the faculty and staff to a four-year term
expiring on August 1. The faculty assembly or assemblies shall oversee all
trustee elections under this subdivision, which shall be open to all faculty and
staff. Vacancies for any cause shall be filled through an election, and the term
of the person so appointed shall expire on the next following August 1.
(b) Appointments by the Governor and, elections by the General Assembly,
and student appointments shall be made with consideration of the geographic
distribution of members to prevent an unfair focus on any single college or
campus.
(c) No trustee shall be a member of the Board of Trustees of the University
of Vermont.
VT LEG #380539 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.136
2025 Page 4 of 8
(d)(1) The Board of Trustees, after notice and a hearing, may remove a
trustee for incompetency, failure to discharge duties, malfeasance, illegal acts,
or other cases inimical to the welfare of the Corporation.
(2) Gubernatorial-appointed trustees shall serve at the pleasure of the
Governor pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 2004.
(3) In the event of a vacancy occurring under this subsection, the
Governor or the Board appointing or electing authority of the vacant position,
as applicable, shall fill the vacancy pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 2173 is amended to read:
§ 2173. BOARD OF TRUSTEES; ORGANIZATION
In addition to the 14 16 elected and appointed trustees, the Board of
Trustees shall include as a member the Governor of Vermont. A majority of
the trustees shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.
Biennially, the Board shall elect one of its voting members to serve as its chair.
Sec. 3. TRANSITION
(a) On or before August 1, 2025, the new faculty or staff member of the
Board of Trustees of the Vermont State Colleges Corporation shall be elected
under Sec. 1 of this act.
(b) On or before September 15, 2025, the new student member shall be
appointed under Sec. 1 of this act. The new student trustee shall serve a partial
term, commencing on September 15, 2025 and ending on March 1, 2026.
VT LEG #380539 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.136
2025 Page 5 of 8
* * * University of Vermont and State Agricultural College; Board of
Trustees * * *
Sec. 4. 16 App. V.S.A. chapter 1, § 1-2 is amended to read:
§ 1-2. BOARD OF TRUSTEES; MEMBERSHIP,; TERMS OF SERVICE;
PRESIDING CHAIR
The Board of Trustees of the University of Vermont and State Agricultural
College shall be composed of 25 27 members, whose term of office shall be six
years, except as to those who are members ex officio and to those who are
student members. Three members shall be appointed by the Governor with the
consent of the Senate. During the legislative session of 1955, the Governor
shall appoint one member for a term of two years, one member for a term of
four years, and one member for a term of six years, and it shall be the duty of
the Governor during the session of the Legislature prior to expiration of the
term of office of any of the members to appoint for the term of six years a
successor to the member whose term is expiring. The terms of office of the
Trustees trustees shall expire on the last day of February in the respective years
of expiration, and the terms of office of their successors shall thereafter begin
on March 1 and expire on the last day of February.
Nine members shall be those who have been heretofore elected by the
Legislature as members of the Board of Trustees of the University of Vermont
and State Agricultural College, and whose terms have not expired, and their
VT LEG #380539 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.136
2025 Page 6 of 8
successors, and it shall be the duty of the Legislature at its session during
which the terms of office of any class of the members expire to elect three
successor members for terms of six years. The terms shall commence on
March 1 in the year of election. The nine Trustees trustees and their successors
shall also constitute the Board of Trustees of the Vermont Agricultural
College.
Nine Ten members shall be those who have been heretofore elected on
behalf of the University of Vermont as members of the Board of Trustees of
the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College and whose terms
have not expired, and their successors, and it shall be the duty of said nine
Trustees ten trustees to elect successors to fill vacancies occurring among their
number upon expiration of the terms of office of any of them or otherwise.
The nine Trustees ten trustees and their successors shall also constitute the
Board of Trustees of the University of Vermont.
Two members shall be students enrolled at the University of Vermont and
State Agricultural College. Their terms of office shall be two years. Prior to
February 1, 1978, the Associated Directors for the Appointment of the
University of Vermont and State Agricultural College Student Trustees,
Incorporated shall select and appoint one student for a term of one year and
one student for a term of two years, both of whom shall be enrolled as full-time
undergraduate or full-time graduate students. Annually thereafter, the
VT LEG #380539 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.136
2025 Page 7 of 8
Directors shall meet to select and appoint one student trustee for a term of two
years in accordance with the provisions of this section. The Directors shall fill
any vacancy occurring among the student trustee members upon the expiration
of the term of office of any of them or otherwise. A student shall be eligible to
serve as a Trustee trustee, provided the student is a full-time undergraduate or
full-time graduate student matriculating in accordance with the degree
qualifications and requirements established by the University of Vermont and
State Agricultural College and if the student remains in that status throughout
the length of the term of office. The term of office of a Student Trustee student
trustee shall begin on March 1 following the date of appointment, and the term
of office shall end the last day of February in the year of expiration. Any
student elected hereunder shall have reached the age of 18 years of age.
One member shall be faculty or staff employed by the University of
Vermont and State Agricultural College and elected by the faculty and staff to
a six-year term expiring on August 1. The Faculty Senate shall oversee all
trustee elections under this subdivision, which shall be open to all faculty and
staff. Vacancies for any cause shall be filled through an election, and the term
of the person so elected shall expire on the next following August 1.
All Trustees trustees so appointed and elected as hereinbefore provided,
shall, together with his or her Excellency, the Governor of the State, and the
President, who shall be, ex officio, a member, constitute an entire Board of
VT LEG #380539 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.136
2025 Page 8 of 8
Trustees of the corporation known as the University of Vermont and State
Agricultural College, who shall have the entire management and control of its
property and affairs, and in all things relating thereto, except in the elections to
fill vacancies, as aforesaid, shall act together jointly, as one entire Board of
Trustees;, provided, that all future elections or appointments to the Board of
Trustees shall be made with special reference to preventing any religious
denominational preponderance in the Board. The Board shall annually, at its
first regular meeting after the election of new trustees, elect one of its members
to serve as Chair.
Sec. 5. TRANSITION
On or before August 1, 2025, new members of the Board of Trustees of the
University of Vermont and State Agricultural College shall be appointed or
elected under Sec. 4 of this act.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380539 v.2